Illinois, session 104th, HB3505.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 9.17 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/9.17)7    Sec. 9.17. Nonnegligible ethylene oxide emissions sources.8    (a) In this Section, "nonnegligible ethylene oxide 9emissions source" means any an ethylene oxide emissions source 10permitted by the Agency that currently emits more than 30 150 11pounds of ethylene oxide as reported on the source's 2017 12Toxic Release Inventory and is located in a county with a 13population of at least 700,000 based on 2010 census data. 14"Nonnegligible ethylene oxide emissions source" does not 15include facilities that are ethylene oxide sterilization 16sources or hospitals that are licensed under the Hospital 17Licensing Act or operated under the University of Illinois 18Hospital Act.19    (b) Beginning 180 days after June 21, 2019 (the effective 20date of Public Act 101-23), no nonnegligible ethylene oxide 21emissions source shall conduct activities that cause ethylene 22oxide emissions unless the owner or operator of the 23nonnegligible ethylene oxide emissions source submits for   HB3505- 2 -LRB104 12091 BDA 22189 b1review and approval of the Agency a plan describing how the 2owner or operator will continuously collect emissions 3information. The plan must specify locations at the 4nonnegligible ethylene oxide emissions source from which 5emissions will be collected and identify equipment used for 6collection and analysis, including the individual system 7components.8        (1) The owner or operator of the nonnegligible 9    ethylene oxide emissions source must provide a notice of 10    acceptance of any conditions added by the Agency to the 11    plan or correct any deficiencies identified by the Agency 12    in the plan within 3 business days after receiving the 13    Agency's conditional acceptance or denial of the plan.14        (2) Upon the Agency's approval of the plan the owner 15    or operator of the nonnegligible ethylene oxide emissions 16    source shall implement the plan in accordance with its 17    approved terms.18    (b-5) Beginning 180 days after the effective date of this 19amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, no nonnegligible 20ethylene oxide emissions source shall conduct activities that 21cause ethylene oxide emissions unless the owner or operator of 22the nonnegligible ethylene oxide emissions source submits for 23review and approval by the Agency an Ambient Air Monitoring 24Plan.25        (1) The Ambient Air Monitoring Plan shall include, at 26    a minimum, the following:  HB3505- 3 -LRB104 12091 BDA 22189 b1            (A) Detailed plans to collect and analyze air 2        samples for ethylene oxide, pursuant to the United 3        States Environmental Protection Agency Methods 325A 4        and 325B, on at least a quarterly basis near the 5        property boundaries of the nonnegligible ethylene 6        oxide emissions source and at community locations with 7        the highest modeled impact pursuant to the modeling 8        conducted under subsection (c). Each quarterly 9        sampling under this subsection shall be conducted over 10        a multiple-day sampling period.11            (B) A schedule for implementation.12            (C) The name of the independent third party 13        company that will be performing sampling and analysis 14        and the company's experience with similar testing.15        (2) The owner or operator of the nonnegligible 16    ethylene oxide emissions source must provide a notice of 17    acceptance of any conditions added by the Agency to the 18    Ambient Air Monitoring Plan, or correct any deficiencies 19    identified by the Agency in the Ambient Air Monitoring 20    Plan, within 3 business days after receiving the Agency's 21    conditional acceptance or denial of the plan.22        (3) Upon the Agency's approval of the plan, the owner 23    or operator of the nonnegligible ethylene oxide emissions 24    source shall implement the Ambient Air Monitoring Plan in 25    accordance with its approved terms. 26    (c) Beginning 180 days after June 21, 2019 (the effective   HB3505- 4 -LRB104 12091 BDA 22189 b1date of Public Act 101-23), no nonnegligible ethylene oxide 2emissions source shall conduct activities that cause ethylene 3oxide emissions unless the owner or operator of the 4nonnegligible ethylene oxide emissions source has performed 5dispersion modeling and the Agency approves the dispersion 6modeling.7        (1) Dispersion modeling must:8            (A) be conducted using accepted United States 9        Environmental Protection Agency methodologies, 10        including Appendix W to 40 CFR 51, except that no 11        background ambient levels of ethylene oxide shall be 12        used;13            (B) use emissions and stack parameter data from 14        any emissions test conducted and 5 years of hourly 15        meteorological data that is representative of the 16        nonnegligible ethylene oxide emissions source's 17        location; and18            (C) use a receptor grid that extends to at least 19        one kilometer around the nonnegligible ethylene oxide 20        emissions source and ensures the modeling domain 21        includes the area of maximum impact, with receptor 22        spacing no greater than every 50 meters starting from 23        the building walls of the nonnegligible ethylene oxide 24        emissions source extending out to a distance of at 25        least 1/2 kilometer, then every 100 meters extending 26        out to a distance of at least one kilometer.  HB3505- 5 -LRB104 12091 BDA 22189 b1        (2) The owner or operator of the nonnegligible 2    ethylene oxide emissions source shall submit revised 3    results of all modeling if the Agency accepts with 4    conditions or declines to accept the results submitted.5    (d) Beginning 180 days after June 21, 2019 (the effective 6date of Public Act 101-23), no nonnegligible ethylene oxide 7emissions source shall conduct activities that cause ethylene 8oxide emissions unless the owner or operator of the 9nonnegligible ethylene oxide emissions source obtains a permit 10consistent with the requirements in this Section from the 11Agency to conduct activities that may result in the emission 12of ethylene oxide.13    (e) The Agency in issuing the applicable permits to a 14nonnegligible ethylene oxide emissions source shall:15        (1) impose a site-specific annual cap on ethylene 16    oxide emissions set to protect the public health; and17        (2) include permit conditions granting the Agency the 18    authority to reopen the permit if the Agency determines 19    that the emissions of ethylene oxide from the permitted 20    nonnegligible ethylene oxide emissions source pose a risk 21    to the public health as defined by the Agency.22(Source: P.A. 101-23, eff. 6-21-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)